Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2619
Sales of cattle; pricing mechanisms; restrictions.

It is unlawful for a packer to enter into a contract to purchase cattle for slaughter using a formula or grid pricing mechanism if the packer fails to negotiate a base price prior to the cattle being committed or scheduled for slaughter.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 19.